Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB947.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Private First Class Bruce A. Cobb Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Bruce A. Cobb was born June 27, 1949, in Bradford, McKean County.(2) Private First Class Cobb enlisted in the United States Marine Corps serving with Company I, 3rd Battalion, 7th Marine Regiment.(3) Private First Class Cobb was killed in action on March 25, 1968, in Quang Nam Province, Vietnam.(4) Private First Class Cobb was awarded several medals during his service and posthumously, including: the Combat Action Ribbon, the Navy Presidential Unit Citation, the 12345678910111213141516171819 Vietnam Service Medal, the Vietnam Civil Actions Unit Citation, the National Defense Service Medal, the Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit citation, the Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal and the Purple Heart.(5) Private First Class Cobb is buried in the Willow Dale Cemetery in Bradford, McKean County.(6) Private First Class Cobb's name is enshrined on the Vietnam War Memorial, in Washington, DC, at Panel 46E, Line 15.(b) Designation.--The bridge identified as Bridge Key 25406, carrying Pennsylvania Route 346 over Willow Creek in Corydon Township, McKean County, is designated the Private First Class Bruce A. Cobb Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0947PN1015 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718